Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Senatorial Districts
5.122.
Twenty-second Senatorial District.

The Twenty-second Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Fayette KY (part)

B103 - Sayre Village

B106 - Wildwood

B111 - Gainesway

B140 - Southeastern Hills

B143 - Tates Creek

B146 - Kenlock

B155 - Ascot

B157 - Kirklevington

B164 - Blueberry Hills

B165 - Oaks

B169 - Mt. Rainier

B170 - Baffin Bay

B172 - Shillito (part)

210670042101015, 210670042101016

Click to view

B174 - Whispering Hills

B179 - Fairhaven

B189 - Kittiwake

B190 - Laredo

B195 - Walden Grove

B196 - Springhouse

B198 - Bridgemont

B202 - Pinnacle

B204 - Atwood

B206 - Rolling Creek

B207 - Fox Harbour

B209 - Charwood

B210 - Fiddler Creek

B211 - Rhodora Ridge

B217 - Cobblestone Knoll

B224 - Windstar

B225 - Goldon Trophy

B227 - Silverbell

B231 - Spencer Park

B232 - River Oak

C161 - Tatesbrook

C162 - Niagara

C174 - Century Hills

C175 - East Lake

C177 - Summerhill

C179 - Brandywine

C182 - Kenesaw Village

C183 - Millcreek

C184 - Mt Foraker

C186 - Old Farm

C188 - Stephen Foster

C190 - Amherst

C198 - Mt. Rushmore

C215 - Four Wynds

C216 - Heartwood

C220 - Park Place

County: Garrard KY

County: Jessamine KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 22, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
22, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
22, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 122, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 22, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 22, effective January 21, 2022.

5.123.
Twenty-third Senatorial District.

The Twenty-third Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Kenton KY (part)

A103 - Covington #7

A104 - Covington #10

A105 - Covington #11

A106 - Covington #12

A107 - Covington #13

A108 - Covington #15

A109 - Covington #19

A110 - Covington #20

A111 - Covington #21

A112 - Covington #23

A113 - Covington #24

A114 - Covington #25

A115 - Covington #26

A116 - Covington #27

A117 - Covington #30

A119 - Covington #33

A120 - Covington #34

A121 - Covington #36

A122 - Covington #39

A123 - Covington #41

A124 - Covington #42

A125 - Bromley

A126 - Ludlow #1

A128 - Ludlow #2

A130 - Taylor Mill #4

A131 - Covington #43

A132 - Park Hills #1

A133 - Park Hills #2

A135 - Covington #44

A136 - Taylor Mill #1

A137 - Taylor Mill #2

A138 - Taylor Mill #3

B105 - Decoursey (part)

211170653001007, 211170653001008, 211170653001009, 211170653001010, 211170653004012, 211170653004014, 211170653004015, 211170653005039, 211170653005040, 211170653005041, 211170658001004, 211170658001027, 211170659001003, 211170659001004, 211170659001005, 211170659001006, 211170659001007, 211170659001008, 211170659001009, 211170659001010, 211170659001011, 211170659001012, 211170659001013, 211170659001014, 211170659001015, 211170659001016, 211170659001017, 211170659001018, 211170659001019, 211170659001020, 211170659001021, 211170659001022, 211170659001023, 211170659001024, 211170659001025, 211170659001026, 211170659001027, 211170659001028, 211170659001029, 211170659001030, 211170659001031, 211170659001032, 211170659001033, 211170659001034, 211170659001035, 211170659001036, 211170659001037, 211170659001038, 211170659001039, 211170659001040, 211170659001041, 211170659001042, 211170659001043, 211170659001044, 211170659001045, 211170659001046, 211170659001047, 211170659001048, 211170659001049, 211170659001050, 211170659001051, 211170659001052, 211170659001053, 211170659001054, 211170659001055, 211170659001056, 211170659001057, 211170659001058, 211170659001059, 211170659001060, 211170659001061, 211170659001065, 211170659001066, 211170659001067, 211170659001068, 211170659001069, 211170659001070, 211170659001071, 211170659002000, 211170659002001, 211170659002002, 211170659002003, 211170659002004, 211170659002005, 211170659002007, 211170659002008

Click to view

B106 - Edgewood #1

B107 - Edgewood #2

B108 - Edgewood #3

B109 - Edgewood #4

B110 - Edgewood #5

B111 - Edgewood #6

B112 - Edgewood #7

B122 - Covington #45

B125 - Erlanger #11 (part)

211170636081020, 211170636081021, 211170636081022, 211170636081023, 211170636082030, 211170636082031, 211170636082033, 211170636082047, 211170636083000, 211170636083001, 211170636083002, 211170636083008

Click to view

B132 - Independence #6 (part)

211170658001016

Click to view

B135 - Erlanger #12

B138 - Erlanger #13

B139 - Edgewood #1.5

B142 - Decoursey #1.5

C101 - Crescent Springs #1

C102 - Crescent Springs #2

C103 - Elsmere #1

C104 - Elsmere #2

C105 - Elsmere #3

C106 - Elsmere #4

C107 - Erlanger #1

C108 - Erlanger #2

C109 - Erlanger #3

C110 - Erlanger #4

C111 - Erlanger #5

C112 - Erlanger #6

C113 - Erlanger #7

C114 - Erlanger #8

C115 - Erlanger #9

C116 - Ft Mitchell #2

C117 - Ft Mitchell #3

C118 - Ft Mitchell #4

C119 - Ft Mitchell #5

C121 - Ft. Mitchell #7

C122 - Ft Wright #1

C124 - Ft Wright #2

C125 - Ft Wright #3

C127 - Lakeside Park #1

C128 - Lakeside Park #2

C130 - Crestview Hills #1

C131 - Crestview Hills #2

C133 - Villa Hills #1

C134 - Villa Hills #2

C135 - Villa Hills #3

C136 - Villa Hills #4

C137 - Villa Hills #5

C138 - Crescent Springs #3

C139 - Elsmere #5

C140 - Ft. Mitchell #1

C141 - Erlanger #10

C142 - Crescent Springs #3.5

C143 - Ft. Wright #4.5

X001 - X001

X002 - X002

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 23, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
23, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
23, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 123, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 23, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 23, effective January 21, 2022.

5.124.
Twenty-fourth Senatorial District.

The Twenty-fourth Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Bracken KY

County: Campbell KY

County: Kenton KY (part)

A101 - Covington #1

A102 - Covington #3

A118 - Covington #31

County: Pendleton KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 24, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
24, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
24, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 124, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 24, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 24, effective January 21, 2022.

5.125.
Twenty-fifth Senatorial District.

The Twenty-fifth Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Clay KY

County: Jackson KY

County: Knox KY

County: McCreary KY

County: Owsley KY

County: Whitley KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 25, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
25, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
25, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 125, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 25, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 25, effective January 21, 2022.

5.126.
Twenty-sixth Senatorial District.

The Twenty-sixth Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Jefferson KY (part)

B149 - Precinct 149 29 District

B155 - Precinct 155 29 District

B163 - Precinct 163 29 District

B166 - Precinct 166 29 District

B169 - Precinct 169 29 District

B181 - Precinct 181 29 District

B184 - Precinct 184 29 District

D108 - Precinct 108 31 District

D109 - Precinct 109 31 District

D114 - Precinct 114 31 District

D115 - Precinct 115 31 District

D116 - Precinct 116 31 District

D117 - Precinct 117 31 District

D120 - Precinct 120 31 District

D121 - Precinct 121 31 District

D122 - Precinct 122 31 District (part)

211110111105000, 211110111105001, 211110111181002, 211110111181003, 211110111181004, 211110111181005, 211110111181006, 211110111181009, 211110111181010, 211110111181011, 211110111182000, 211110111182001, 211110111182003

Click to view

D132 - Precinct 132 31 District

D135 - Precinct 135 31 District

D137 - Precinct 137 31 District (part)

211110111102002, 211110111102003, 211110111102008, 211110111104002, 211110111104004, 211110111104005, 211110111106001, 211110111106002, 211110111106003, 211110111106004, 211110111106008

Click to view

D138 - Precinct 138 31 District

D139 - Precinct 139 31 District

D140 - Precinct 140 31 District

D141 - Precinct 141 31 District

D142 - Precinct 142 31 District (part)

211110111104001, 211110111182002, 211110111183004, 211110111184000, 211110111184001, 211110111184010

Click to view

E139 - Precinct 139 32 District

E141 - Precinct 141 32 District

E142 - Precinct 142 32 District

E143 - Precinct 143 32 District

E148 - Precinct 148 32 District

E152 - Precinct 152 32 District

E154 - Precinct 154 32 District

E155 - Precinct 155 32 District

E158 - Precinct 158 32 District

E159 - Precinct 159 32 District

E166 - Precinct 166 32 District

E167 - Precinct 167 32 District

E169 - Precinct 169 32 District (part)

211110107023026, 211110107023027

Click to view

E171 - Precinct 171 32 District

E175 - Precinct 175 32 District

E177 - Precinct 177 32 District

E181 - Precinct 181 32 District

E183 - Precinct 183 32 District

E184 - Precinct 184 32 District

E185 - Precinct 185 32 District

G140 - Precinct 140 34 District

G141 - Precinct 141 34 District

G150 - Precinct 150 34 District

G163 - Precinct 163 34 District

G164 - Precinct 164 34 District

G165 - Precinct 165 34 District

G169 - Precinct 169 34 District

H160 - Precinct 160 35 District

I151 - Precinct 151 37 District

I155 - Precinct 155 37 District

L111 - Precinct 111 41 District (part)

211110049001014, 211110050002000, 211110050002013, 211110050002014, 211110050002018, 211110062001013, 211110062002001, 211110062002002, 211110062002003, 211110062002004, 211110062002005, 211110062002006, 211110062002007, 211110062002008, 211110062002009, 211110062002010, 211110062002011, 211110062002012, 211110062002013, 211110062002014, 211110062002015, 211110062002020, 211110062002021, 211110062002027, 211110062002028, 211110062002029, 211110062002030, 211110062002031, 211110062002032, 211110062002033, 211110062002034, 211110062002035, 211110062002036, 211110062002037, 211110062002038, 211110062002039, 211110062002040, 211110062002041, 211110062002046, 211110062002047, 211110062002048, 211110062002049

Click to view

L112 - Precinct 112 41 District (part)

211110062001017, 211110062001026, 211110062001027, 211110062001028, 211110062001029, 211110062001031, 211110062001032, 211110062001033, 211110062001034, 211110062001035, 211110062001036, 211110062001037, 211110062002026, 211110062002042, 211110062002043, 211110062002044, 211110062002050, 211110062002051, 211110062002052, 211110062002053, 211110062002054, 211110062002055, 211110062002056, 211110062002057, 211110062002058, 211110065001000, 211110065001001, 211110065001009, 211110065001011

Click to view

L113 - Precinct 113 41 District (part)

211110059021079, 211110059022002, 211110059022003, 211110059022004, 211110059022005, 211110059022008, 211110059022009, 211110059022010, 211110059022011, 211110059022012, 211110059022013, 211110059022014, 211110059023000, 211110059023001, 211110059023002, 211110059023003, 211110059023007, 211110059023008, 211110059023009, 211110059023011, 211110059023014

Click to view

L115 - Precinct 115 41 District

L117 - Precinct 117 41 District

L118 - Precinct 118 41 District

L119 - Precinct 119 41 District

L134 - Precinct 134 41 District

L135 - Precinct 135 41 District

L136 - Precinct 136 41 District

L138 - Precinct 138 41 District

L139 - Precinct 139 41 District

L141 - Precinct 141 41 District (part)

211110049001008, 211110049001009, 211110049001010, 211110049001015, 211110049002017, 211110050002001, 211110050002002

Click to view

L142 - Precinct 142 41 District (part)

211110050001000, 211110050002003, 211110050002004, 211110050002005, 211110050002006, 211110050002007

Click to view

L146 - Precinct 146 41 District

L151 - Precinct 151 41 District

L152 - Precinct 152 41 District

L153 - Precinct 153 41 District

L164 - Precinct 164 41 District (part)

211110074002010, 211110074002017, 211110074002018, 211110074002020, 211110074002021, 211110074002022, 211110074002023, 211110074002029, 211110074002030, 211110074002031, 211110074002032, 211110074002033, 211110074002034, 211110074002035, 211110074002042, 211110076021005, 211110076021008, 211110076021009

Click to view

M137 - Precinct 137 42 District

M138 - Precinct 138 42 District

M139 - Precinct 139 42 District

M140 - Precinct 140 42 District

M143 - Precinct 143 42 District

M150 - Precinct 150 42 District

M164 - Precinct 164 42 District

M172 - Precinct 172 42 District

M174 - Precinct 174 42 District

M175 - Precinct 175 42 District

N125 - Precinct 125 43 District

N126 - Precinct 126 43 District

N130 - Precinct 130 43 District

N131 - Precinct 131 43 District

N135 - Precinct 135 43 District (part)

211110074000003, 211110074002006, 211110074002007, 211110074002008, 211110074002009, 211110074002024, 211110074002025, 211110074002026, 211110074002027, 211110074002028, 211110074002036, 211110074002065

Click to view

N141 - Precinct 141 43 District

N142 - Precinct 142 43 District

N143 - Precinct 143 43 District

N144 - Precinct 144 43 District

N146 - Precinct 146 43 District

Q119 - Precinct 119 46 District

Q137 - Precinct 137 46 District

Q138 - Precinct 138 46 District

S116 - Precinct 116 48 District

S119 - Precinct 119 48 District

S166 - Precinct 166 48 District

S167 - Precinct 167 48 District

V115 - Precinct 115 36 District

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 26, effective January 8, 1992; 1994, ch. 497, § 9, effective November 9, 1994; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
26, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
26, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 126, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 26, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 26, effective January 21, 2022.

5.127.
Twenty-seventh Senatorial District.

The Twenty-seventh Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Bourbon KY

County: Fayette KY (part)

A102 - Barker

A128 - Meadowthorpe

A130 - Oakwood

A135 - St. Martins

A152 - Highlands

A175 - Horse Park

A183 - Silver Creek (part)

210670037041010, 210670037041011

Click to view

A191 - Kenova Trace

A195 - Coventry

A199 - Ferndale

A200 - Red Clover

A201 - Winding Oak

A203 - Enterprise

A204 - Locust Blossom (part)

210670037012028, 210670037042000, 210670037042001, 210670037042002, 210670037042003, 210670037042004, 210670037042005, 210670037042006, 210670037042007, 210670037042008, 210670037042009, 210670037042010, 210670037042011, 210670037042012

Click to view

A205 - Fieldrush

C154 - Man O War

C159 - Shandon Park

County: Fleming KY

County: Harrison KY

County: Mason KY

County: Nicholas KY

County: Robertson KY

County: Rowan KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 27, effective January 8, 1992; 1994, ch. 497, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
27, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
27, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 127, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 27, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 27, effective January 21, 2022.

5.128.
Twenty-eighth Senatorial District.

The Twenty-eighth Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Bath KY

County: Clark KY

County: Fayette KY (part)

A115 - Green Acres

A120 - Julius Marks

A126 - Marlboro

A134 - Radcliffe

A144 - Winburn

A164 - Hollow Creek

A165 - Griffin Gate

A168 - Blue Acres

A179 - Valley Farm

C109 - Bryan Station

C118 - Deep Springs

C121 - Eastland

C125 - Helm

C127 - Hermitage

C153 - Kingston

C155 - Mary Todd

C163 - Greenbrier

C185 - N Elkhorn

C187 - Chilesburg

C200 - Deer Crossing

C207 - North Pointe

C209 - Shaker Run

C211 - Biloxi

C213 - Chatsworth

C217 - Denali

C218 - Levi Todd

C222 - Rosewood

C223 - Wilkes Run

C224 - Bay Springs Park

C225 - Boone Station (part)

210670039182023, 210670039182037, 210670039182038, 210670039182039, 210670039182041, 210670039182042, 210670039182043, 210670039182044, 210670039182045, 210670039182046, 210670039182047, 210670039182048, 210670039182049, 210670039182050, 210670039182051, 210670039182052, 210670039182053, 210670039182054, 210670039182055, 210670039182056, 210670039182057, 210670039182058, 210670039182059, 210670039182060, 210670039182061, 210670040071007, 210670040071008, 210670040071009, 210670040071010, 210670040072021, 210670040072022, 210670040072023, 210670040072024, 210670040072025, 210670040072026, 210670040072027, 210670040072028, 210670040072029, 210670040072036, 210670040072037, 210670040072038, 210670040072039, 210670040072040, 210670040072041, 210670040072042, 210670040072043, 210670040072044, 210670040072045, 210670040072046, 210670040072047, 210670040072048, 210670040072049, 210670040072050, 210670040072051, 210670040072053, 210670040072054

Click to view

C228 - Many Oaks Park

C232 - Turtle Creek

C236 - Passage Mound

C237 - Orchard Grass

C239 - Needlerush

County: Menifee KY

County: Montgomery KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 28, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
28, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
28, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 128, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 28, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 28, effective January 21, 2022.

5.129.
Twenty-ninth Senatorial District.

The Twenty-ninth Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Bell KY

County: Floyd KY

County: Harlan KY

County: Knott KY

County: Letcher KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 29, effective January 8, 1992; 1994, ch. 497, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
29, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
29, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 129, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 29, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 29, effective January 21, 2022.

5.130.
Thirtieth Senatorial District.

The Thirtieth Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Breathitt KY

County: Estill KY

County: Lee KY

County: Leslie KY

County: Magoffin KY

County: Morgan KY

County: Perry KY

County: Powell KY

County: Wolfe KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 30, effective January 8, 1992; 1994, ch. 497, § 10, effective November 9, 1994; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
30, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
30, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 130, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 30, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 30, effective January 21, 2022.

5.131.
Thirty-first Senatorial District.

The Thirty-first Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Elliott KY

County: Johnson KY

County: Lawrence KY

County: Martin KY

County: Pike KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 31, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
31, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
31, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 131, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 31, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 31, effective January 21, 2022.

5.132.
Thirty-second Senatorial District.

The Thirty-second Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Logan KY

County: Simpson KY

County: Todd KY

County: Warren KY (part)

A101 - Peachtree (part)

212270108011001, 212270108011002, 212270108011003, 212270108011004, 212270108011007, 212270108011011, 212270108011013, 212270108011014, 212270108011015, 212270108011016, 212270108011017, 212270108011018

Click to view

A102 - Crossridge

A105 - Natcher

A106 - Grider Pond

A108 - Shive Kiel

A109 - Greenwood

A112 - Middle Bridge (part)

212270107011007, 212270107011008, 212270107011009, 212270107011010, 212270107011011, 212270107011012, 212270107011013, 212270107011014, 212270107011015, 212270107011016, 212270107011017, 212270108011005, 212270108011006, 212270108011008, 212270108011009, 212270108011010, 212270108011012

Click to view

A113 - Campbell

A115 - Watts Mill

B110 - Broadway (part)

212270105001002, 212270105001003, 212270105001004, 212270105001005, 212270105001011, 212270105001012, 212270105001013, 212270105001014, 212270105001015, 212270105002028, 212270105002030, 212270105002031, 212270105002032, 212270105002033, 212270105002034, 212270105002035, 212270105002036, 212270105002037, 212270105002040, 212270105002041, 212270105002046, 212270105002047

Click to view

C101 - Bg Jr High

C102 - Carver Harris

C103 - Tc Cherry

C104 - Mcneill

C105 - Cabell

C106 - Crestmoor

C107 - Hunting Creek

C108 - Cedarwood

C109 - Csx Railroad

C110 - Big Red

C111 - Hidden River

C112 - Three Springs

E101 - Blue Level (part)

212270111001022, 212270111001030, 212270111001031, 212270111001032, 212270111001033, 212270111001036, 212270111001037, 212270111001038, 212270111001039, 212270111001040, 212270111001041, 212270111001044, 212270111001045, 212270111001046, 212270111001047, 212270111001049, 212270111001050

Click to view

E209 - 16-5-9

F101 - Woodburn

F102 - Plano

F103 - Drake

F104 - Rockfield

F105 - Richpond

F106 - Matlock

F107 - Motley

F108 - Alvaton

F109 - Trammel Creek

F111 - Olde Stone

F112 - Drakes Creek

F113 - Hunters Crossing

F114 - Sutherland Farms

F115 - Greystone

F116 - Bluegrass

F117 - Windover

F118 - Larmon Mill

F119 - Jfs

F201 - 17-6-1

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 32, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
32, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
32, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 132, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 32, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 32, effective January 21, 2022.

5.133.
Thirty-third Senatorial District.

The Thirty-third Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Jefferson KY (part)

A118 - Precinct 118 28 District

A119 - Precinct 119 28 District

A121 - Precinct 121 28 District

A127 - Precinct 127 28 District

A129 - Precinct 129 28 District

A134 - Precinct 134 28 District

A135 - Precinct 135 28 District

A139 - Precinct 139 28 District

A140 - Precinct 140 28 District

A142 - Precinct 142 28 District

A143 - Precinct 143 28 District

J138 - Precinct 138 38 District

K123 - Precinct 123 40 District

K130 - Precinct 130 40 District

K131 - Precinct 131 40 District

K137 - Precinct 137 40 District (part)

211110043012000, 211110043012001, 211110043012002, 211110043012003, 211110043012004

Click to view

L104 - Precinct 104 41 District

L108 - Precinct 108 41 District

L110 - Precinct 110 41 District

L111 - Precinct 111 41 District (part)

211110049001000, 211110049001012, 211110049001013, 211110059011008, 211110059011009, 211110059011010, 211110059011011, 211110059011012, 211110059011013, 211110059011014, 211110059011015, 211110059011016, 211110059011017, 211110059011018, 211110059011019, 211110059011020, 211110059011022, 211110059011023, 211110059011024, 211110059011025, 211110059011026, 211110059011027, 211110059012011, 211110059012012, 211110059012013, 211110059012014, 211110059012015, 211110059012016, 211110059012017, 211110059012018, 211110059012019, 211110059012020, 211110062001006, 211110062001014, 211110062001018, 211110062001019, 211110062001020, 211110062001021, 211110062001022, 211110062002000, 211110062002016, 211110062002017, 211110062002018, 211110062002019, 211110062002022

Click to view

L112 - Precinct 112 41 District (part)

211110062001023, 211110062001024, 211110062001025, 211110062001030, 211110062002023, 211110062002024, 211110062002025, 211110062002045

Click to view

L113 - Precinct 113 41 District (part)

211110059012002, 211110059012005, 211110059012006, 211110059012007, 211110059012008, 211110059012009, 211110059012010, 211110059021025, 211110059021026, 211110059021027, 211110059021028, 211110059021029, 211110059021030, 211110059021031, 211110059021054, 211110059021055, 211110059021056, 211110059021057, 211110059021058, 211110059021059, 211110059021060, 211110059021061, 211110059021062, 211110059021065, 211110059021066, 211110059021067, 211110059021068, 211110059021069, 211110059021075, 211110059022000, 211110059022001, 211110059022006, 211110059022007

Click to view

L140 - Precinct 140 41 District

L141 - Precinct 141 41 District (part)

211110049001001, 211110049001002, 211110049001003, 211110049001004, 211110049001005, 211110049001006, 211110049001007, 211110049001011, 211110049002000, 211110049002016

Click to view

L144 - Precinct 144 41 District

L145 - Precinct 145 41 District

L147 - Precinct 147 41 District

L149 - Precinct 149 41 District

L150 - Precinct 150 41 District

L154 - Precinct 154 41 District

L155 - Precinct 155 41 District

L157 - Precinct 157 41 District

L158 - Precinct 158 41 District

L159 - Precinct 159 41 District

L160 - Precinct 160 41 District

L161 - Precinct 161 41 District

L162 - Precinct 162 41 District

L163 - Precinct 163 41 District

L164 - Precinct 164 41 District (part)

211110074002019, 211110074002039, 211110074002040, 211110074002041, 211110074002043, 211110074002044, 211110074002046, 211110074002047, 211110074002048, 211110074002049, 211110074002050, 211110074002051, 211110074002053, 211110074002063

Click to view

M102 - Precinct 102 42 District

M103 - Precinct 103 42 District

M104 - Precinct 104 42 District

M105 - Precinct 105 42 District

M107 - Precinct 107 42 District

M110 - Precinct 110 42 District

M129 - Precinct 129 42 District

M130 - Precinct 130 42 District

M133 - Precinct 133 42 District

M141 - Precinct 141 42 District

M142 - Precinct 142 42 District

M148 - Precinct 148 42 District

M149 - Precinct 149 42 District

M167 - Precinct 167 42 District

M169 - Precinct 169 42 District

M170 - Precinct 170 42 District

M171 - Precinct 171 42 District

M173 - Precinct 173 42 District

N101 - Precinct 101 43 District

N102 - Precinct 102 43 District

N103 - Precinct 103 43 District

N104 - Precinct 104 43 District

N105 - Precinct 105 43 District

N106 - Precinct 106 43 District

N107 - Precinct 107 43 District

N108 - Precinct 108 43 District

N109 - Precinct 109 43 District

N110 - Precinct 110 43 District

N111 - Precinct 111 43 District

N112 - Precinct 112 43 District

N113 - Precinct 113 43 District

N115 - Precinct 115 43 District

N117 - Precinct 117 43 District

N124 - Precinct 124 43 District

N127 - Precinct 127 43 District

N128 - Precinct 128 43 District

N134 - Precinct 134 43 District

N135 - Precinct 135 43 District (part)

211110059021000, 211110059021001, 211110059021003, 211110059021024, 211110074002037, 211110074002038, 211110074002045

Click to view

N136 - Precinct 136 43 District

N137 - Precinct 137 43 District

N138 - Precinct 138 43 District

N139 - Precinct 139 43 District

N145 - Precinct 145 43 District

N147 - Precinct 147 43 District

N148 - Precinct 148 43 District

N149 - Precinct 149 43 District

N150 - Precinct 150 43 District

O105 - Precinct 105 44 District

O107 - Precinct 107 44 District

O109 - Precinct 109 44 District

O111 - Precinct 111 44 District

O112 - Precinct 112 44 District

O113 - Precinct 113 44 District

O117 - Precinct 117 44 District

O119 - Precinct 119 44 District

O121 - Precinct 121 44 District

O123 - Precinct 123 44 District

O133 - Precinct 133 44 District

O134 - Precinct 13444 District

O135 - Precinct 135 44 District

O139 - Precinct 139 44 District

O141 - Precinct 141 44 District

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 33, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
33, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
33, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 133, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 33, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 33, effective January 21, 2022.

5.134.
Thirty-fourth Senatorial District.

The Thirty-fourth Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Fayette KY (part)

B218 - Laurelwood

B221 - Magnolia Gardens

C114 - Autumn Ridge

C151 - Cove Lake

C152 - Hartland

C160 - Walnut Hill

C164 - East Hills

C165 - Crestview

C173 - Buckhorn

C176 - Squire Oak

C178 - Pleasant Grove

C180 - Broadmoor

C192 - Chetford

C193 - Sheffield Place

C194 - Chestnut Hill

C196 - Mapleleaf

C197 - Mooreland

C199 - Woodfield

C201 - Telluride

C203 - Gingermill

C205 - Crystal Falls

C208 - Rothbury

C210 - Mint Hill

C212 - Brookewind

C219 - Market Garden

C225 - Boone Station (part)

210670040072000, 210670040072001, 210670040072002, 210670040072003, 210670040072004, 210670040072005, 210670040072006, 210670040072007, 210670040072008, 210670040072020, 210670040072052

Click to view

C227 - Fortune Hill

C229 - Raven Run

C230 - Red Leaf

C233 - Walnut Creek

C235 - Red Stone

C238 - Villa

County: Madison KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 34, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
34, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
34, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 134, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 34, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 34, effective January 21, 2022.

5.135.
Thirty-fifth Senatorial District.

The Thirty-fifth Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Jefferson KY (part)

C101 - Precinct 101 30 District

C102 - Precinct 102 30 District

C103 - Precinct 103 30 District

C104 - Precinct 104 30 District

C105 - Precinct 105 30 District

C106 - Precinct 106 30 District

C108 - Precinct 108 30 District

C109 - Precinct 109 30 District

C110 - Precinct 110 30 District

C111 - Precinct 111 30 District

C113 - Precinct 113 30 District

C143 - Precinct 143 30 District

G103 - Precinct 103 34 District

G104 - Precinct 104 34 District

G106 - Precinct 106 34 District

G107 - Precinct 107 34 District

H123 - Precinct 123 35 District

H124 - Precinct 124 35 District

H125 - Precinct 125 35 District

H126 - Precinct 126 35 District

H127 - Precinct 127 35 District

H130 - Precinct 130 35 District

H131 - Precinct 131 35 District

H132 - Precinct 132 35 District

H138 - Precinct 138 35 District

H144 - Precinct 144 35 District

H146 - Precinct 146 35 District

H147 - Precinct 147 35 District

H154 - Precinct 154 35 District

H155 - Precinct 155 35 District

H158 - Precinct 158 35 District

H161 - Precinct 161 35 District

I122 - Precinct 122 37 District

I123 - Precinct 123 37 District

I124 - Precinct 124 37 District

I125 - Precinct 125 37 District

I126 - Precinct 126 37 District

I130 - Precinct 130 37 District

I138 - Precinct 138 37 District

I142 - Precinct 142 37 District

I149 - Precinct 149 37 District

I150 - Precinct 150 37 District

I156 - Precinct 156 37 District

J152 - Precinct 152 38 District

J153 - Precinct 153 38 District

K104 - Precinct 104 40 District

K105 - Precinct 105 40 District

K110 - Precinct 110 40 District

K112 - Precinct 112 40 District

K113 - Precinct 113 40 District

K116 - Precinct 116 40 District

K122 - Precinct 122 40 District

K133 - Precinct 133 40 District

K135 - Precinct 135 40 District

K136 - Precinct 136 40 District

K140 - Precinct 140 40 District

K141 - Precinct 141 40 District

K142 - Precinct 142 40 District

K149 - Precinct 149 40 District

K150 - Precinct 150 40 District

L142 - Precinct 142 41 District (part)

211110050002008, 211110050002009, 211110050002010, 211110050002011, 211110050002012, 211110050002015, 211110050002016, 211110050002017

Click to view

L143 - Precinct 143 41 District

L148 - Precinct 148 41 District

L156 - Precinct 156 41 District

M121 - Precinct 121 42 District

M123 - Precinct 123 42 District

M124 - Precinct 124 42 District

M131 - Precinct 131 42 District

M146 - Precinct 146 42 District

M147 - Precinct 147 42 District

M162 - Precinct 162 42 District

M163 - Precinct 163 42 District

M166 - Precinct 166 42 District

M168 - Precinct 168 42 District

Q101 - Precinct 101 46 District

Q103 - Precinct 103 46 District

Q104 - Precinct 104 46 District

Q105 - Precinct 105 46 District

Q112 - Precinct 112 46 District

Q113 - Precinct 113 46 District

Q114 - Precinct 114 46 District

Q116 - Precinct 116 46 District

Q117 - Precinct 117 46 District

Q122 - Precinct 122 46 District

Q123 - Precinct 123 46 District

Q124 - Precinct 124 46 District

Q126 - Precinct 126 46 District

Q127 - Precinct 127 46 District

Q134 - Precinct 134 46 District

Q136 - Precinct 136 46 District

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 35, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
35, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
35, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 135, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 35, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 35, effective January 21, 2022.

5.136.
Thirty-sixth Senatorial District.

The Thirty-sixth Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Jefferson KY (part)

B153 - Precinct 153 29 District

B172 - Precinct 172 29 District

B183 - Precinct 183 29 District

E144 - Precinct 144 32 District

E145 - Precinct 145 32 District

E157 - Precinct 157 32 District

E160 - Precinct 160 32 District

E161 - Precinct 161 32 District

E162 - Precinct 162 32 District

E163 - Precinct 163 32 District

E164 - Precinct 164 32 District

E165 - Precinct 165 32 District

E168 - Precinct 168 32 District

E169 - Precinct 169 32 District (part)

211110107021004, 211110107021005, 211110107021007, 211110107021008, 211110107021009, 211110107023000, 211110107023001, 211110107023007, 211110107023008, 211110107023009, 211110107023014, 211110107023015, 211110107023016, 211110107023017, 211110107023024, 211110107023025, 211110107023038, 211110107023039, 211110107023040

Click to view

E173 - Precinct 173 32 District

E176 - Precinct 176 32 District

E178 - Precinct 178 32 District

E179 - Precinct 179 32 District

E180 - Precinct 180 32 District

F106 - Precinct 106 33 District

F145 - Precinct 145 33 District

F151 - Precinct 151 33 District

F152 - Precinct 152 33 District

F153 - Precinct 153 33 District

F154 - Precinct 154 33 District

F155 - Precinct 155 33 District

F156 - Precinct 156 33 District

F158 - Precinct 158 33 District

F161 - Precinct 161 33 District

F163 - Precinct 163 33 District

F164 - Precinct 164 33 District

F166 - Precinct 166 33 District

F167 - Precinct 167 33 District

F169 - Precinct 169 33 District

F170 - Precinct 170 33 District

F171 - Precinct 171 33 District

F176 - Precinct 176 33 District

F180 - Precinct 180 33 District

F183 - Precinct 183 33 District

F184 - Precinct 184 33 District

S129 - Precinct 129 48 District

S139 - Precinct 139 48 District

S140 - Precinct 140 48 District

S150 - Precinct 150 48 District (part)

211110103093004, 211110103093005, 211110103093006, 211110103093007, 211110103093008, 211110103093009, 211110103093011, 211110103093012, 211110103093013, 211110103094004

Click to view

S152 - Precinct 152 48 District

S160 - Precinct 160 48 District

S164 - Precinct 164 48 District

S165 - Precinct 165 48 District

S168 - Precinct 168 48 District

V101 - Precinct 101 36 District (part)

211110111161047, 211110111161048, 211110111161057

Click to view

V102 - Precinct 102 36 District

V104 - Precinct 104 36 District

V105 - Precinct 105 36 District (part)

211110111162000, 211110111162001, 211110111162002, 211110111162014, 211110111162015, 211110115202000, 211110116041008, 211110116041009, 211110116041010, 211110116041011, 211110116041012, 211110116041013, 211110116041014, 211110116041015, 211110116041029, 211110116041033, 211110116041034, 211110116061028, 211110116061029, 211110116061030, 211110116061031, 211110116061034, 211110116061035, 211110116061039

Click to view

V106 - Precinct 106 36 District (part)

211110111161039, 211110111161040, 211110111161049, 211110111161050, 211110111161051, 211110111161052, 211110111161053, 211110115171000, 211110115171001, 211110115171002, 211110115171003, 211110115171004, 211110115171005

Click to view

V107 - Precinct 107 36 District (part)

211110116041005, 211110116041006, 211110116041007, 211110116041035, 211110116041036, 211110116061005, 211110116061042, 211110116061044, 211110116061047, 211110116061048, 211110116061049, 211110116061063, 211110116061064, 211110116061065, 211110116061066, 211110116061067, 211110116061068, 211110116061069, 211110116061070

Click to view

V108 - Precinct 108 36 District

V109 - Precinct 109 36 District

V110 - Precinct 110 36 District

V111 - Precinct 111 36 District

V112 - Precinct 112 36 District

V113 - Precinct 113 36 District

V114 - Precinct 114 36 District

V116 - Precinct 116 36 District

V117 - Precinct 117 36 District

V118 - Precinct 118 36 District

V119 - Precinct 119 36 District

V120 - Precinct 120 36 District

V121 - Precinct 121 36 District

V122 - Precinct 122 36 District

V123 - Precinct 123 36 District

V124 - Precinct 124 36 District

V125 - Precinct 125 36 District

V126 - Precinct 126 36 District

V127 - Precinct 127 36 District

V128 - Precinct 128 36 District

V129 - Precinct 129 36 District

V130 - Precinct 130 36 District

V131 - Precinct 131 36 District

V132 - Precinct 132 36 District

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 36, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
36, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
36, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 136, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Extra. Sess.), ch. 1, § 36, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 36, effective January 21, 2022.